Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.285

Suspension of members of board or supervisory committee by board—For cause.

The board may, for cause, suspend a member of the board or a member of the supervisory committee until a special membership meeting, called for that purpose, is held under RCW 31.12.195. The membership meeting must be held within ninety days after the suspension. The members attending the meeting shall vote whether to remove a suspended party. For purposes of this section, "cause" includes demonstrated financial irresponsibility, a breach of fiduciary duty to the credit union, or activities which, in the judgment of the board, threaten the safety and soundness of the credit union.

[ 2015 c 114 s 4; 2013 c 34 s 5; 1997 c 397 s 21; 1984 c 31 s 30.]